Hawaii statutes.
§803-47 Reports concerning intercepted
wire, oral, or electronic communications; reports concerning pen registers and
trap and trace devices. (a) In January of each year, the attorney general
and county prosecuting attorneys of this State shall report to the
administrative director of the courts of this State and to the administrative
office of the United States Courts:

(1) The fact that an order or extension was applied
for;

(2) The kind of order or extension applied for;

(3) The fact that the order or extension was granted
as applied for, was modified, or was denied;

(4) The period of interceptions authorized by the
order, and the number and duration of any extensions of the order;

(5) The offense specified in the order or
application, or extension of an order;

(6) The identity of the investigative or law
enforcement officer and agency requesting the application and the person
authorizing the request for application;

(7) The nature of the facilities from which or the
place where communications were to be intercepted;

(8) A general description of the interceptions made
under such order or extension, including:

(A) The approximate nature and frequency of
incriminating communications intercepted;

(B) The approximate nature and frequency of
other communications intercepted;

(C) The approximate number of persons whose
communications were intercepted; and

(D) The approximate nature, amount, and cost
of the personnel and other resources used in the interceptions;

(9) The number of arrests resulting from
interceptions made under an order or extension of the order, and the offenses
for which the arrests were made;

(10) The number of trials resulting from the
interceptions;

(11) The number of motions to suppress made with
respect to the interceptions and the number granted or denied;

(12) The number of convictions resulting from the
interceptions and the offenses for which the convictions were obtained and a
general assessment of the importance of the interceptions;

(13) The information required by paragraphs (2)
through (6) of this subsection with respect to orders or extensions obtained in
a preceding calendar year and not yet reported; and

(14) Other information required by the rules and
regulations of the administrative office of the United States Courts.

(b) In March of each year the administrative
director of the courts shall transmit to the legislature a full and complete
report concerning the number of applications for orders authorizing or
approving the interception of wire, oral, or electronic communications and the
number of orders and extensions granted or denied during the preceding calendar
year. The report shall include a summary and analysis of the data required to
be filed with the administrative director of the courts by the attorney general
and prosecuting attorneys.

(c) The attorney general, at least twenty days
prior to the convening of each regular session, shall annually report to the
legislature on the number of pen register orders and orders for trap and trace
devices applied for by law enforcement agencies of the State. [L 1978, c 218,
pt of §2; am L 1986, c 303, §7; am L 1989, c 164, §9; am L 2006, c 200, pt of
§4]

Previous
Vol14_Ch0701-0853
Next